Maryland, session 2025, HB0521.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
19–101.
(a) It is the policy of the State not to enter into a contract with any business entity
that has discriminated in the solicitation, selection, hiring, or commercial treatment of
vendors, suppliers, subcontractors, or commercial customers on the basis of race, color,
religion, ancestry or national origin, sex, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender
identity, or on the basis of disability or any otherwise unlawful use of characteristics
regarding the vendor’s, supplier’s, or commercial customer’s employees or owners.
(b) Nothing in this title shall be construed to prohibit or limit otherwise lawful
efforts to remedy the effects of discrimination that have occurred or are occurring in the
marketplace.
(c) A complaint of discrimination shall be filed within 4 years after the date the
cause of action accrues.
19–102.
It is the intent of the State to avoid becoming a passive participant in private sector
commercial discrimination by refusing to procure goods and services from business entities
that discriminate in the solicitation, selection, hiring, or commercial treatment of vendors,
suppliers, subcontractors, or commercial customers on the basis of race, color, religion,
ancestry or national origin, sex, age, marital status, gender identity, sexual orientation, or

HOUSE BILL 521 3
on the basis of disability or other unlawful forms of discrimination by providing a procedure
for receiving, investigating, and resolving complaints of discrimination filed against
business entities that:
(1) have submitted a bid or proposal; or
(2) have been selected to engage in, or are engaged in, providing goods or
services to the State.
19–103.
(a) In this title the following words have the meanings indicated.
(b) “Administrative law judge” means the individual assigned by the Office of
Administrative Hearings to conduct a hearing under this title.
(c) “ANTISEMITISM” MEANS A CERTAIN PERCEPTION OF JEWS, WHICH MAY
BE EXPRESSED AS HATRED TOWARD JEWS, INCLUDING RHETORICAL AND PHYSICAL
MANIFESTATIONS DIRECTED TOWARD:
(1) JEWISH OR NON–JEWISH INDIVIDUALS OR THEIR PROPERTY; OR
(2) JEWISH COMMUNITY INSTITUTIONS AND RELIGIOUS
INSTITUTIONS.
(D) (1) “Business entity” means any person, as defined in § 1–101(d) of this
article, firm, sole proprietorship, partnership, corporation, limited liability company, or
other business entity or a combination of any of these entities, including any financial
institution, developer, consultant, prime contractor, subcontractor, supplier, or vendor,
that has submitted a bid or proposal for, has been selected to engage in, or is engaged in
providing goods or services to the State.
(2) “Business entity” does not include another governmental entity that is
subject to Title VI of the Civil Rights Act of 1964.
[(d)] (E) “Commercial customer” means a business entity that procured or
attempted to procure goods or services from a business entity for business as opposed to
personal, family, or household use.
[(e)] (F) “Commercial Nondiscrimination Policy” means the provisions
contained under this title and any regulations or documentation requirements adopted by
the Commission on Civil Rights in accordance with this title.
[(f)] (G) (1) “Commercial treatment” means the treatment of a vendor,
supplier, subcontractor, or commercial customer by a business entity that affects the

HOUSE BILL 521
conduct of business and the terms and conditions under which business is transacted
between two or more business entities.
(2) “Commercial treatment” does not mean treatment that is unrelated to
a business transaction or the conduct of business.
[(g)] (H) “Commission” means the Commission on Civil Rights.
[(h)] (I) “Commission staff” means employees of the Commission on Civil Rights
designated by the Commission to process, investigate, and pursue complaints filed under
this title.
[(i)] (J) “Contract” means an agreement with a business entity that is let by or
on behalf of the State for that business entity to sell or lease supplies or goods, or to provide
construction, real estate development, financial, insurance, professional, or other services
to the State in return for a fee or any other form of compensation to be paid or provided by
the State.
[(j)] (K) (1) “Discrimination” means any disadvantage, difference,
distinction, or preference in the solicitation, selection, hiring, or commercial treatment of a
vendor, supplier, subcontractor, or commercial customer on the basis of race, color, religion,
ancestry or national origin, sex, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, or
on the basis of disability or any otherwise unlawful use of characteristics regarding the
vendor’s, supplier’s, or commercial customer’s employees or owners.
(2) “Discrimination” does not include lawful efforts to remedy the effects of
discrimination that have occurred or are occurring in the marketplace.
[(k)] (L) “Economic development project” means a real estate development,
construction, or renovation project for which the State provides:
(1) funding or other financial assistance, other than payments in exchange
for goods or services;
(2) land;
(3) road improvements;
(4) tax credits; or
(5) a below market purchase price.
[(l)] (M) (1) “Financial institution” means a person:
(i) engaged in the business of lending money, guaranteeing loans,
extending credit, securing bonds, or providing venture or equity capital; or

HOUSE BILL 521 5
(ii) that offers financial services in connection with State projects or
the administration of State government.
(2) “Financial institution” includes banks, savings and loans, venture
capital companies, insurance companies, bonding companies, mortgage companies, credit
unions, and brokers.
[(m)] (N) “Party” means:
(1) the person who has filed a complaint under this title;
(2) the respondent business entity that has been alleged to have violated
this title; and
(3) the Commission that is responsible for investigating the complaint and
rendering the initial findings.
[(n)] (O) “Retaliate” means to take any action that has a material negative effect
against any person, business or other entity for reporting any incident of discrimination,
testifying as a witness at a hearing, or providing requested assistance to Commission staff
in any investigation of an incident of discrimination under this title.
[(o)] (P) “Services” includes construction, real estate development, financial,
insurance, professional, and other services.
[(p)] (Q) “State subcontract” means an agreement for the provision of goods or
the performance of a particular portion of work to be performed under a contract with the
State, where:
(1) the party providing the goods or services is on reasonable notice that
the work is to be performed under a State contract; and
(2) the amount to be paid for such goods and services is material with
respect to the overall amount of the contract.
[(q)] (R) “State subcontractor” means the party providing goods or services
under a State subcontract.
19–104.
(a) As a condition of participating in an economic development project, the State
shall require the governmental entity, quasi–governmental entity, corporation, developer,
or contractor that receives assistance from the State to comply with this title:
(1) in administering the economic development project; and

HOUSE BILL 521
(2) in awarding contracts to manage or perform the work entailed in the
economic development project.
(b) (1) Each contract and subcontract awarded in connection with an economic
development project shall contain the nondiscrimination clause set forth in § 19–115 of this
title.
(2) Any claim of discrimination relating to the economic development
project shall be subject to investigation and adjudication by the State in accordance with
this title.
(c) This title does not apply to:
(1) other than a lease of real estate for the State’s use, any real property
acquisition by the State, including property subject to condemnation;
(2) settlement of litigation;
(3) except for proceedings to enforce this title, settlement of judicial or
administrative enforcement proceedings by or on behalf of the State; and
(4) agreements concerning standards for locating facilities in a State
right–of–way when a business entity has a statutory right to be in the right–of–way.
19–115.
All requests for bids or proposals issued for State contracts shall include the
following certification to be completed by the bidder:
“The undersigned bidder hereby certifies and agrees that the following information
is correct:
In preparing its bid on this project, the bidder has considered all proposals submitted
from qualified, potential subcontractors and suppliers, and has not engaged in
“discrimination” as defined in § 19–103 of the State Finance and Procurement Article of the
Annotated Code of Maryland; to wit: discrimination in the solicitation, selection, or
commercial treatment of any subcontractor, vendor, supplier, or commercial customer on
the basis of race, color, religion, ancestry or national origin, sex, age, marital status, sexual
orientation, gender identity, or on the basis of disability or other unlawful forms of
discrimination. WITHOUT LIMITING THE FOREGOING, “DISCRIMINATION” ALSO
INCLUDES ANTISEMITISM AS DEFINED IN § 19–103 OF THE STATE FINANCE AND
PROCUREMENT ARTICLE OF THE ANNOTATED CODE OF MARYLAND. Without
limiting the foregoing, “discrimination” also includes retaliating against any person or
other entity for reporting any incident of “discrimination”. Without limiting any other
provision of the solicitation for bids on this project, it is understood and agreed that, if this
certification is false, such false certification will constitute grounds for the State to reject
the bid submitted by the bidder on this project, and terminate any contract awarded based

HOUSE BILL 521 7
on the bid. As part of its bid or proposal, the bidder shall provide to the State a list of all
instances within the immediate past 4 years where there has been a final adjudicated
determination in a legal or administrative proceeding in the State of Maryland that the
bidder discriminated against its subcontractors, vendors, suppliers, or commercial
customers, and a description of the status or resolution of that complaint, including any
remedial action taken. As a condition of submitting a bid or proposal to the State, the bidder
agrees to comply with the State’s Commercial Nondiscrimination Policy as described under
Title 19 of the State Finance and Procurement Article of the Annotated Code of Maryland.”.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.